Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 6. Agreements to Furnish Water

Cross references. —

As to drinking water standards, see §§

35-4-220

to

35-4-224

.

For general state law relative to water, see title 41.

Cited

in

Barber v. City of Douglas, 931 P.2d 948,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 560, 561 and 564 to 566; 70A Am. Jur. 2d Special or Local Assessments § 31; 78 Am. Jur. 2d Waterworks and Water Companies §§ 18 to 20, 23, 24.

Propriety of injunctive relief against diversion of water by municipal corporation or public utility, 42 ALR3d 426.

Liability of water supplier for damages resulting from furnishing impure water, 54 ALR3d 936.

§ 15-7-601.
Extension of system; within corporate limits.

Any city or town owning its municipal water system or plant may enter into agreements with the owners of lands who desire to have the water system extended to their property within the corporate limits of the city or town. The land owners shall agree to pay to the city or town a stipulated amount, in installments as may be agreed upon, for a period not to exceed ten (10) years, regardless of the use or nonuse of water during the period, and to making the charges a lien upon their respective lands. When the agreement has been filed with the city or town clerk, the charges become a lien upon the lands. Any city or town, by ordinance, may prescribe the rules and regulations governing the agreements and provide for the enforcement of the lien.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 467; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-467; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-460; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-602.
Extension of system; outside corporate limits; rates; existing contracts; controversies; appeal.

All cities and towns owning their municipal water system or plant may enter into agreements with customers whose lands lie outside the corporate limits to supply water for their use and needs. The water system may be extended and maintained beyond the corporate limits only if it is economically feasible in the opinion of the governing body. The governing body may finance the extension and maintenance of the water system through revenue bonds or other means granted by law for financing of its water system and improvements. A one-time connection fee reasonably calculated to permit recovery of a proportionate share of the municipality’s infrastructure cost necessary to treat and convey the water may be charged. A one-time fee may also be charged to recover reasonable expenses incurred by the public entity in determining the actual costs of treating and delivering water to the point of connection. Any charges for special services such as customer’s line maintenance shall be in addition to the water rate. The rate established for use of water pursuant to this section is as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a city or town whose water supply system is funded in whole or in part by state grants or loans which at any time after April 1, 1999 or later, enters into a new contract or extends an existing contract to supply water to customers outside its corporate limits shall in establishing rates be limited to the actual costs of providing and delivering water as defined by paragraph (ii) of this subsection, except as otherwise provided by W.S.

15-7-407

;

For customers outside their corporate limits beginning April 1, 1999, where the city or town is a recipient of state grants or loans, and except as otherwise provided in W.S.

15-7-407

, the established water rate shall not exceed the actual costs of providing and delivering water to the point of connection to the city’s or town’s water system. Prior to December 1, 1998, or where the city or town is not a recipient of state grants or loans and except as otherwise provided in W.S. 15-7-407, the established rate shall be applied uniformly and shall not exceed two (2) times the established rate within the corporate limits. The governing body of the city or town may establish one (1) or more unincorporated service areas in each of which an average water rate may be used for all customers. As used in this paragraph, “actual costs of providing and delivering water” shall include a proportionate share of the following costs related to the water system:

Fees, interest charges and principal payments on all bonds issued and other indebtedness incurred to construct, purchase or improve the utility;

Salaries and wages of employees;

The cost of materials, supplies, utilities and outside services;

Other costs directly related to the delivery system;

The cost for providing and maintaining a depreciation fund, a fund for emergencies and a fund for acquisition and development of new water rights and water sources;

Administrative and overhead expenses; and

The cost of acquiring, transporting, processing and treating water.

If requested by the party seeking water service from the city or town and upon approval of the city or town, subsection (a) of this section shall not apply if the ratio of the rate charged to customers outside the corporate limits of the city or town to the established rate within the corporate limits are less than one and one-quarter (1.25) to one (1).

The provisions of this section are not subject to certificates of public convenience and necessity of the public service commission. However, if there is a controversy between the municipality and a consumer outside the corporate limits of the municipality with regard to the establishment of rates, maintenance or servicing in a manner other than as contracted for or as provided in this article, the public service commission may review the matter in controversy, hold hearings, take testimony and make recommendations. The commission’s recommendations may be appealed to the district court pursuant to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The ultimate prevailing party shall be awarded a just and reasonable attorneys fee.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 468; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-468; Laws 1971, ch. 44, § 1; 1977, ch. 127, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-461; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1, ch. 43, § 1; 1998, ch. 118, § 1; 1999, ch. 88, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1999, ch. 88, § 2, provides: “Nothing in this act shall prohibit a municipality, joint powers board or other entity from providing water below cost.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Scope of authority to review controversy. —

Subsection (c) does not authorize the commission to review every controversy between the municipality and a water consumer outside of the city. State ex rel. Badley v. Sheridan, 513 P.2d 647,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1973).

Insofar as the alleged controversy is in regard to servicing under an alleged contract, the commission is not authorized to review. State ex rel. Badley v. Sheridan, 513 P.2d 647,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1973).

§ 15-7-603.
Supplying federal government authorized; existing contracts confirmed.

Any city or town may enter into and fully perform contracts with the United States government, or any department or representative thereof, or road construction contractor working under a contract with the state transportation commission or with public utility corporations to supply water for their use and needs at any place within the corporate limits of the city or town, or adjacent thereto.

Any contracts entered into by any city or town and the United States government, or any department or representative thereof, or any public utility corporation doing business within the corporate limits or adjacent thereto, are confirmed and are valid and binding contracts, any other law or act to the contrary notwithstanding.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 469; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-469; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-462; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 15-7-604.
Supplying railroads authorized; ratification of existing contracts.

Any city or town may contract to furnish water at and adjacent to the city or town, for a term of years as agreed upon, to:

Any railroad company for use in its shops, locomotives and for any other railroad purposes;

Any subsidiary or affiliate of any such railroad company whose principal business at or adjacent to the city or town is the furnishing of material or service, or both, to the railroad company;

Any industrial user of water whose principal needs for water, at or adjacent to the city or town, are defined as preferred uses of water after the industry or industries has established its own priority.

Any city or town, upon terms and for consideration it considers adequate, may ratify any contract which it has made with regard to supplying water to any railroad for the uses and purposes stated in this section.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 470, 471; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-470, 15.1-471; W.S. 1977, §§ 15-7-463, 15-7-464; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-7-605.
Purchase authorized.

Any city or town may purchase water from outside its corporate limits upon terms and conditions agreed upon by the parties.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 472; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-472; W.S. 1977, § 15-7-465; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Applied

in

Barber v. City of Douglas, 931 P.2d 948,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 15-7-606.
Use of surplus water funds.

Any city or town shall use any surplus funds arising from the sale of water services for the redemption and cancellation of bonds, if any, issued to pay the purchase price of the water or the cost of the construction, extension and enlargement of the system. The city or town shall not redeem any bonds at any sum greater than par, plus a premium of not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the face value on all unearned interest coupons attached to any bond purchased, nor pay more than the actual market price of the bonds at the time the bonds are redeemed. Any surplus funds after the redemption of bonds, may be paid from the water enterprise account into the general fund of the city or town. Provided however, sufficient funds, as determined by the governing body, shall be maintained in the water enterprise account to cover debt services, operating costs and reasonable reserves for depreciation of the system and anticipated acquisition of water resources.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 103, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 103, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.